Illinois, session 104th, HB1799.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 235 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)7    Sec. 235. Credit for wages paid to persons 62 years of age 8or older.9    (a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 102026, each taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the tax 11imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 12in the amount of $2,500 for each person who is (i) 62 years of 13age or older during the taxable year and (ii) employed by the 14taxpayer at a location in this State for not less than 185 days 15during the taxable year. For partners, shareholders of 16Subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 17companies, if the liability company is treated as a 18partnership for purposes of federal and State income taxation, 19there shall be allowed a credit under this Section to be 20determined in accordance with the determination of income and 21distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 and 22Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. 23    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce   HB1799- 2 -LRB104 03976 HLH 14000 b1the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 2the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 3may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 45 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 5credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 6a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 7that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 8shall be applied first. 9    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 10250.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.